Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 20. GENERAL CLASS B WHOLESALER'S PERMIT

Sec. 20.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may:

(1) purchase and import vinous liquors from wineries, rectifiers, and wine manufacturers who are the holders of nonresident seller's permits or their agents;

(2) purchase vinous liquors from wholesalers in the state;

(3) sell the vinous liquors in the original containers in which they are received to retailers and wholesalers authorized to sell them in this state, including holders of local distributor's permits, mixed beverage permits, and certain nonprofit entity temporary event permits; and

(4) sell the vinous liquors to qualified persons outside the state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 418, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 3 (S.B. 731), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 750 (S.B. 515), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 77(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 77(b), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 20.04. TRANSPORTING LIQUOR. (a) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may transport liquor, if the transportation is for a lawful purpose, from:

(1) the place of purchase to the holder's place of business; and

(2) the place of sale or distribution to the purchaser.

(b) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may transport liquor from one wet area to another wet area across a dry area if that course of transportation is necessary or convenient.

(c) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit transporting liquor under this section shall provide to the commission:

(1) a full description of each motor vehicle used by the permit holder for transporting liquor; and

(2) any other information the commission requires.

(d) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may transport liquor only in a vehicle that is:

(1) described by Subsection (c)(1);

(2) owned or leased in good faith by the permit holder or by the permit holder's agent; and

(3) printed or painted with the designation required by the commission.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 78, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 20.05. STORAGE. (a) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may store liquor:

(1) on the permitted premises; or

(2) inside the county in which the permittee's business is located in a:

(A) public bonded warehouse authorized to store liquor under Chapter 46; or

(B) private warehouse that is:

(i) owned or leased by the permit holder; and

(ii) operated by the permit holder.

(b) The holder of a general class B wholesaler's permit may not store liquor in a dry area.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 79, eff. September 1, 2021.